Utah statutes.
54-3-21.   Commission to be furnished information and copies of records -- Hearings before commission to be public -- Privilege.

(1) Every public utility shall furnish to the commission in such form and such detail as the commission shall prescribe all tabulations and computations and all other information required by it to carry into effect any of the provisions of this title, and shall make specific answers to all questions submitted by the commission.

(2)  Every public utility receiving from the commission any blanks with directions to fill the same shall cause the same to be properly filled so as to answer fully and correctly each question propounded therein; in case it is unable to answer any question, it shall give a good and sufficient reason for such failure.

(3)  Whenever required by the commission every public utility shall deliver to the commission copies of any or all maps, profiles, contracts, agreements, franchises, reports, books, accounts, papers and records in its possession or in any way relating to its property or affecting its business, and also a complete inventory of all its property in such form as the commission may direct.

(4)  Hearings or proceedings of the commission or of any commissioner shall be open to the public, and all records of all hearings or proceedings or orders, rules or investigations by the commission or any commissioner shall be at all times open to the public; provided, that any information furnished the commission by a public utility or by any officer, agent or employee of any public utility may be withheld from the public whenever and during such time as the commission may determine that it is for the best interests of the public to withhold such information. Any officer or employee of the commission who in violation of the provisions of this subsection divulges any such information is guilty of a misdemeanor.

